test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: móðir
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: móður
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: móður
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: móður
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: møður
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: møðrum
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: møðra
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: móðirin
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: [móðurina, móðrina]
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: [móðurini, móðrini]
    móðir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: móðurinnar
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: møðurnar
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: møðrunum
    móðir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: møðranna
